Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Chapter 9. Surplus Property Procurement Commission

§ 31-9-1.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the term “office of general services” shall mean the Governor’s office of general services acting through the bureau of surplus property.

Wherever the term “surplus property procurement commission” appears in the laws of the State of Mississippi, it shall be construed to mean the Governor’s office of general services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9028-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 214, § 1; Laws, 1948, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 336, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1964, ch. 492; Laws, 1980, ch. 491, § 23; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 31-9-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§31-9-3. [Codes, 1942, § 9028-02; Laws, 1946, ch. 214, § 2]

§ 31-9-5.
Powers and duties.

The Office of General Services with the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board shall negotiate and contract with any appropriate agency or commission of the United States government or of the State of Mississippi for the purpose of purchasing or otherwise securing surplus material or property in bulk lots or quantities, and for the purpose of assisting all agencies, departments, institutions and instrumentalities of the State of Mississippi, the boards of supervisors of the various counties, and the governing authorities of the various municipalities, drainage districts and other taxing units in purchasing, leasing or otherwise securing surplus material or property. After ascertaining the needs of the various state departments and institutions, counties, municipalities, drainage districts and other taxing units, the Office of General Services may enter into contracts with the governing authorities of such governmental entities as will enable them to carry out the provisions of this section.

The Office of General Services also may acquire state or federal government surplus property for nonprofit and tax exempt health and educational institutions, Boy Scouts, Girl Scouts, Camp Fire Girls, military academies, volunteer fire departments, nonprofit cooperative water associations, Boys Clubs of America and Girls Clubs of America; however, deliveries to these institutions shall be made only after they have established their eligibility by meeting the requirements of the federal government, have requested the Office of General Services to act for them in acquiring government surplus property, and have agreed to comply with both the state and federal laws pertaining to acquisition and utilization of the property.

[Repealed]

The Office of General Services may do all other things which may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 9028-03, 9028-05, 9028-08; Laws, 1946, ch. 214, §§ 3, 5; Laws, 1952, ch. 337, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1956, ch. 366, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1958, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 377, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 10; Laws, 1971, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 26; Laws, 1992, ch. 572 § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 392, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 577, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 31-9-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§31-9-7. [Codes, 1942, § 9028-04; Laws, 1946, ch. 214, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 374, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 470, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 398, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 34; Laws, 1970, ch. 474, § 1]

§ 31-9-9.
Laws regulating public purchases waived.

All laws or parts of laws requiring the various state institutions, departments, and agencies, the boards of supervisors of the various counties, and the governing authorities of the various municipalities, drainage districts, and other taxing units to advertise or request and receive bids for the purchase of furniture, equipment, supplies, and other commodities are hereby waived for the purposes of this chapter and shall not be applicable to purchases made hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9028-06; Laws, 1946, ch. 214, § 6.

§ 31-9-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§31-9-11. [Codes, 1942, § 9028-07; Laws, 1946, ch. 14, § 7]

§ 31-9-13.
Revolving fund.

In lieu of regular appropriations, the Department of Finance and Administration may assess against each institution, agency or individual acquiring surplus property from and through the Department of Finance and Administration a fee or commission on each item in sufficient amount to establish and maintain a revolving fund, to be used to operate and support the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall follow the procedure outlined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services in establishing the fund, and the fund shall never exceed more than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) above and beyond four (4) months of operating expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration.

With this revolving fund so acquired, the Department of Finance and Administration shall meet all items of expense incurred in acquiring, transporting, warehousing and distributing property to eligible applicants and also all items of expense incident to the operation of the offices of the Department of Finance and Administration, including salaries, office supplies and necessary general expenses, and all other items as are covered by legislative appropriation for those purposes.

The Department of Finance and Administration may escalate, budget and expend funds from the revolving fund in an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) in any one fiscal year to carry out the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9028-08; Laws, 1952, ch. 337, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1956, ch. 366, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1958, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 377, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 10; Laws, 1971, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 27; Laws, 2005, ch. 475, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 306, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 31-9-15.
Inventories.

The Office of General Services shall furnish to the State Auditor of Public Accounts copies of transfers of property to state boards, commissions and agencies on all property transferred to such agencies, federal reviews, in addition to an inventory on all furniture, equipment, machinery and vehicles used by the Office of General Services in carrying out the purposes of this chapter. The Office of General Services shall likewise keep a perpetual current inventory on all property in books and records.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9028-08; Laws, 1952, ch. 337, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1956, ch. 366, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1958, ch. 470, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 377, § 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 398, § 2; Laws, 1962, ch. 484, § 10; Laws, 1971, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 28; Laws, 1995, ch. 562, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009).